Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.850

Board of adjustment—Appeal—Notice of time and place.

Upon the filing of an appeal from an administrative determination, or from the action of the zoning adjustor, the board of adjustment shall set the time and place at which the matter will be considered. At least a ten day notice of such time and place together with one copy of the written appeal, shall be given to the official whose decision is being appealed. At least ten days notice of the time and place shall also be given to the adverse parties of record in the case. The officer from whom the appeal is being taken shall forthwith transmit to the board of adjustment all of the records pertaining to the decision being appealed from, together with such additional written report as he or she deems pertinent.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4119; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.850. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 85.]